Wyoming, session 2025, HB0103.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 35-8-402(a)(iv) through (vi) is
amended to read:
35-8-402. Regulations and specifications generally;
application to certain columbariums.
(a) No person, firm, partnership, association,
company or corporation shall construct any community vault,
crypt, columbarium or mausoleum, wholly or partially above
the surface of the ground, to be used to contain the body
or remains of any dead human being unless the same shall be
located within the confines of an established cemetery
containing not less than five (5) acres, which cemetery
shall have been in existence and operation for a period of
at least five (5) years immediately preceding the time of
the erection thereof, nor until plans and specifications
therefor shall be approved by the department of health.
Such plans and specifications shall set forth the sections,
halls, rooms, corridors, elevators or other subdivisions
thereof, with their descriptive names and numbers, and
shall provide:
(iv) That the exterior walls and roof shall be
constructed of granite, or marble, slate, sandstone,
limestone, concrete block masonry or any other material of
similar properties that achieves structural integrity and
shall not be less than six (6) inches in thickness designed
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0103
ENROLLED ACT NO. 40, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
to be structurally sound and to withstand exterior
weathering;
(v) That exterior doors shall be constructed of
granite, marble, slate, sandstone or limestone, bronze or
aluminum alloys or any other material or alloy of similar
properties;
(vi) That interiors shall be constructed of
granite, marble, slate, sandstone, or limestone, concrete
or any other material of similar properties that achieves
structural integrity;
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0103
ENROLLED ACT NO. 40, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
3